Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.900

Construction—1923 c 16.

Words used in this chapter importing the singular number may also be applied to the plural of persons and things. Words importing the plural may be applied to the singular, and words importing the masculine gender may be extended to females also.

[ 1923 c 16 s 37.]

NOTES:

Number and gender: RCW 1.12.050.